North Dakota, session 69, HB1253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 10 of section 53-06.1-15.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
10. Impose a monetary fine on a licensed organization, organization that has a permit, distributor,
manufacturer, owner of an authorized site, or third-party business operating gaming and
working as an agent of the charity for failure to comply with this chapter or any gaming rule.
This fine may be in addition to or in lieu of a license suspension or revocation. The monetary
fine for each violation by an:
a. An organization is a minimum of twenty-five dollars and may not exceed two percent of
the organization's average quarterly gross proceeds, or five thousand dollars, whichever
is greater. The monetary fine for each violation by a
b. A distributor is a minimum of one hundred dollars and may not exceed five thousand
dollars. The monetary fine for each violation by a
c. A manufacturer is a minimum of five hundred dollars and may not exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars. This fine may be in addition to or in place of a license suspension
or revocation.
d. An owner of an authorized site is a minimum of two hundred fifty dollars and may not
exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.

H. B. NO. 1253 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1253.
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 2 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State